Hawaii statutes.
[§183D-52] Interisland
transportation and possession of wild or feral deer prohibited. No person
shall intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly possess, transfer, transport, or
release after transport through interisland movement any live wild or feral deer
unless permitted by the department or other department of the State. [L 2012, c
144, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next